Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1764
Collection of taxes; suit on behalf of state; where brought.

Suit shall be brought in behalf of the state in the district court of the county in which the treasurer holds office or resides, and process may be directed to any county in the state.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 188, p. 457;

R.S.1913, § 6516;

C.S.1922, § 6044;

C.S.1929, § 77-1949;

R.S.1943, § 77-1764.